Utah statutes.
4-24-23.   Lifetime permit in lieu of brand inspection certificate -- Fees -- Permit to accompany animal -- Transfer.

The department may issue a "lifetime" permit upon the payment of a fee determined by the department pursuant to Subsection 4-2-2(2), in lieu of a certificate of brand inspection, for the transport of any horse or mule within or outside the state.  The words "lifetime travel permit" shall be stamped or printed on the permit.  The permit shall accompany each horse or mule while it is in transit and shall identify the animal to which it applies by age, sex, color, brand, and scars.  A lifetime transportation permit is valid for as long as the horse or mule to which it applies continues to be owned by the person to whom the permit is issued.  A lifetime permit is transferable upon the transfer of ownership of such an animal, upon application for transfer and the payment of a permit transfer fee to the department in an amount determined by the department pursuant to Subsection 4-2-2(2).

